Utah statutes.
76-10-1604.   Enforcement authority of peace officers.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, peace officers in the state of Utah
shall have authority to enforce the criminal provisions of this act by
initiating investigations, assisting grand juries, obtaining indictments,
filing informations, and assisting in the prosecution of criminal cases
through the attorney general or county attorneys' offices.
